Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1591
Property; exempt from judicial process.

Except to the extent a local housing agency or its controlled affiliates may otherwise expressly agree, all real and personal property of a local housing agency and its controlled affiliates shall be exempt from execution, levy, and sale for the payment of debt or otherwise pursuant to any judicial or other process.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 20.